Arkansas, session 2025, HB1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - REGULATORY DIVISION. There is hereby
established for the Department of Finance and Administration - Alcoholic
Beverage Control Administration for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G305C DFA REGULATORY ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) G279C DFA REG ASST ADMIN - ADMINISTRATION 1 GRADE GS15
(3) G280C DFA REG ASST ADMIN - ENFORCEMENT 1 GRADE GS15
(4) R040C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
*JAP007*
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
(5) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS11
(6) A007C AUDIT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(7) G246C DFA REGULATORY BRANCH MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(8) X229C DFA REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT AGENT III 3 GRADE GS10
(9) T108C DFA REGULATORY BRANCH SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(10) X196C DFA SEN REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT AGENT 8 GRADE GS08
(11) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 2 GRADE GS08
(12) A081C AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS07
(13) X131C DFA REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT AGENT 29 GRADE GS07
(14) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(15) T061C SENIOR IA 1 GRADE GS06
(16) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 1 GRADE GS06
(17) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 3 GRADE GS04
(18) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(19) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS04
(20) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 71

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - REGULATORY DIVISION. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Finance & Administration - Regulatory
Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-
time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - REGULATORY DIVISION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Regulatory Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,870,188
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
(01.1)EXTRA HELP 7,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,033,955
(03) OVERTIME 10,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 416,927
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 34,986
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,378,056

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - REGULATORY DIVISION - SALES TO MINORS
ENFORCEMENT - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Finance and Administration, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services, operating expenses, and the purchase of promotional items
of the Department of Finance and Administration - Regulatory Division - Sales
to Minors Enforcement - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $537,932
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 256,094
(03) OVERTIME 5,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 332,072
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 1,700
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 5,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,137,798

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - REGULATORY DIVISION - TOBACCO INSPECTION
PROGRAM - FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
Finance and Administration, to be payable from the federal funds as
designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Regulatory Division - Tobacco Inspection Program - Federal for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $310,705
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 128,339
(03) OVERTIME 17,041
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 180,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 31,242
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $672,327

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - REGULATORY DIVISION - CIGARETTE FIRE SAFETY.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Cigarette Fire Safety Standard Fund,
for personal services and operating expenses to support fire safety and
prevention programs of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Regulatory Division - Cigarette Fire Safety for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FIRE SAFETY & PREVENTION $50,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - REGULATORY DIVISION - SPIRITUOUS AND VINOUS
BEVERAGES. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Fund, for
promotion, education, training, alcohol safety awareness, enforcement
activities, equipment and vehicle purchases of the Department of Finance and
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
Administration - Regulatory Division for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PROMOTION, EDUCATION, TRAINING, SAFETY
AWARENESS ENROLLMENT $300,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - REGULATORY DIVISION - REVENUE ENFORCEMENT.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration
- Regulatory Division - Revenue Enforcement, to be payable from the Arkansas
Tobacco Control Revenue Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
related to carrying out the purposes authorized in ACA 19-6-831 for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $657,044
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 247,728
(03) OVERTIME 5,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 127,817
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,098,089

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - REGULATORY DIVISION - UNTAXED TOBACCO
FORFEITURE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Regulatory Division, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operational expenses and expense associated with untaxed
tobacco forfeiture authorized in ACA 26-57-247 for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) UNTAXED TOBACCO FORFEITURE $100,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAL MARIJUANA COMMISSION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be
payable from the Medical Marijuana Commission Fund, for refunds and
reimbursements related to agency medical marijuana expenses of the Department
of Finance and Administration - Alcoholic Beverage Control Administration for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $500,000

SECTION 11. REGULAR SALARIES - RACING COMMISSION. There is hereby
established for the Department of Finance and Administration - Racing
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) B009N DFA DOG RACING VETERINARIAN 1 GRADE MP04
(2) G287C DFA REGULATORY ASST ADMIN - RACING 1 GRADE GS15
(3) X069C DFA RACING SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS09
(2.1) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(4) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(5) X142C DFA RACING COMMISSION JUDGE 2 GRADE GS05
(6) A104C DFA RACING COMMISSION OFFICE AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS04
(7) B110C VETERINARIAN ASSISTANT 4 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 14

SECTION 12. EXTRA HELP - RACING COMMISSION. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Finance and Administration - Racing
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from
funds appropriated herein for such purposes: thirty-one (31) temporary or
part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - RACING COMMISSION - STATE OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Finance and
Administration - Racing Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $726,390
(02) EXTRA HELP 460,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 313,686
(04) OVERTIME 10,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 290,914
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 7,500
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,858,490

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - RACING COMMISSION - CASH OPERATIONS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to
be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration - Racing Commission
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTRA HELP $200,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 120,409
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 600,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 50,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) REFUND/REIMBURSEMENTS 5,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $980,409

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - RACING COMMISSION - PURSES AND AWARDS FUND.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
transfers to the Department of Finance and Administration - Racing Commission
- Purses and Awards Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/INVESTMENTS/TRANSFERS $25,000,000

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - RACING COMMISSION - COMPULSIVE GAMBLING
ADDICTION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account,
for compulsive gambling disorder treatment and educational programs as
defined by Amendment 100 to the Arkansas Constitution by the Department of
Finance and Administration - Racing Commission for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GAMBLING ADDICTION TREATMENT &
EDUCATION PROGRAMS $200,000
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
SECTION 17. REGULAR SALARIES – RACING COMMISSION – CASINO GAMING SECTION. There
is hereby established for the Department of Finance and Administration – Racing
Commission – Casino Gaming Section for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) A006C DFA REV TAX DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
(2) A033C TAX AUDITOR SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS11
(3) A054C TAX AUDITOR II 6 GRADE GS09
(4) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(5) C059C DFA SERVICE REPRESENTATIVE 27 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 40

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION – RACING COMMISSION – CASINO GAMING SECTION.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration,
to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration – Racing
Commission - Casino Gaming Section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

Item Fiscal Year
No. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,814,526
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 739,222
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,567,748

SECTION 19. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1125
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 20. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 21. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee





03-18-2025 17:12:34 JAP007